New Jersey, session 221, S375.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority shall conduct, or cause to be conducted, a study of the feasibility of establishing and operating a convention center project within the meadowlands complex. b.    The authority shall provide the study required pursuant to subsection a. of this section, for the construction, use, and development of a convention center on or near the site of the arena project owned and operated by the authority within the meadowlands complex. c.     Upon completion of the study, the authority shall analyze and review all available information concerning the feasibility of constructing, operating, and managing a convention center project in the meadowlands complex, including an analysis and review of the various options that may be presented in the study as to the scope and nature of such a convention center project. d.    Based upon its analysis and review of the information available from the feasibility study, and such other studies as the authority may authorize, the authority shall submit a report containing its findings and recommendations to the Legislature concerning the development of a convention center within the meadowlands complex. e.     The authority shall complete the convention center feasibility study and submit its report to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) no later than one year from the effective date of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.